Washington statutes.
RCW 17.34.020

Cooperation with insurance fund authorized.

Consistent with law and within available appropriations, the departments, agencies and officers of this state may cooperate with the insurance fund established by the Pest Control Compact.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 130 s 2.]